Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Ratite Birds

247.870.
Definition of “ratite” — Status of ratites as farm products and livestock.

“Ratite” means members of a family of birds which have no keel and cannot fly. It includes ostriches, emus, rheas, kiwis, and cassowaries.

Ratites are raised for the purpose of producing feathers, meat, hide, animal by-products, and breeding stock.

Ratites and their products are farm products and livestock for purposes of financial transactions and collateral.

Ratites are livestock and are not wild animals for purposes of hunting and wildlife laws.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Administrative regulations relating to health and disease control of ratites, KRS

257.315

.

Taxation of ratites for state purposes only, KRS

132.200

.

Sales and use taxes, exemption of ratites, KRS

139.480

.